Rhode Island statutes. Title 25 Holidays and Days of Special Observance
Chapter 3 Work on Holidays and Sundays

25-3-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the director of the department of labor and training;

“Economic necessity” means and refers to any case where the director determines that:

Both the economics and technology of manufacture of the product or a component of the product requires continuous conversion or processing of raw materials, intermediates, or components without interruption to avoid disproportionate loss of production capacity;

The economics and technology of data processing requires the continuous operation of data processing equipment to avoid deterioration of equipment or a disproportionate loss of computer capacity or where customer requirements are that data processing equipment must be available for input or output on a continuous basis;

Because prevailing industry practice in the manufacturing or processing of the product or in the provision of banking or financial services is to operate facilities within that industry seven (7) days per week, the failure to operate on one or more Sundays or holidays will subject the employer to a competitive hardship within the industry in which the employer competes;

Maintenance or improvement of plant or equipment cannot practically or efficiently be performed while production is in process;

The scheduling of production on Sundays or holidays is necessitated by interrupted or allocated energy supplies, or shortages of raw materials or component parts;

An employer has been deprived of its normal production schedule by fire, flood, power failure, or other circumstances beyond its control; or

Circumstances, temporary in nature, are that undue economic hardship would result from the inability to operate on one or more Sundays or holidays;

“Employee” means any individual employed by an employer, but shall not include:

Any individual employed in agriculture or maritime trades, including commercial fishing or boat repairs;

Any physician, dentist, attorney at law, or accountant;

Any individual engaged in the provision of health care or maintenance;

Any individual employed in a restaurant, hotel, motel, summer camp, resort, or other recreational facility (except health clubs);

Any individual employed in the business of offshore petroleum or gas exploration or extraction, or in the business of servicing or supplying persons engaged in exploration or extraction;

Supervisory employees as defined in 29 U.S.C. § 213(a)(1) and regulations issued pursuant to that section;

Any individual employed by an employer holding a license issued pursuant to chapter 23 of title 5; or

Any individual employed as part of a telephonic delivery of customer service, sales operations, and ancillary services related to those services and operations, except for specific employment positions in the telecommunications industry that are part of any collective bargaining agreement or employment contract in effect on July 2, 1998.

“Employer” means any natural person, partnership, firm, corporation, or other enterprise engaged in industry, transportation, communication, or any other commercial occupation involving one or more employees; and

“Holidays” means Sunday, New Year’s Day, Memorial Day, July 4th, Victory Day, Labor Day, Columbus Day, Veterans’ Day, Thanksgiving, and Christmas; provided, that as it pertains to all offices of state and municipal government, the term “holiday” includes in addition to the holidays enumerated in this subdivision, Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday, as defined in §

25-2-18

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 319, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 248, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 4.

25-3-2.
Increased pay required for work on Sundays and holidays.

Any person, association, or corporation receiving a permit from the division of racing and athletics of the department of business regulation to operate any horse racing, dog racing, or jai alai event under the parimutuel system and any person, association, or corporation doing business under a contractual agreement to provide any services to any horse racing, dog racing, or jai alai event under the parimutuel system shall compensate the necessary persons to conduct the event on Sundays and/or holidays for at least one and one-half (11/2) times the normal rate of pay for the work performed, and it shall not be grounds for discharge or other penalty upon an employee for refusing to work at the horse racing, dog racing, or jai alai event upon any of the Sundays and holidays enumerated in this chapter, and nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit any person from engaging in or being employed in connection with the holding or operation of the licensed event.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 409, § 1.

25-3-3.
Work on Sundays or holidays.

Work performed by employees on Sundays and holidays must be paid for at least one and one-half (11/2) times the normal rate of pay for the work performed; provided: (1) That it is not grounds for discharge or other penalty upon any employee for refusing to work upon any Sunday or holiday enumerated in this chapter; and (2) Any manufacturer that operates for seven (7) continuous days per week is exempt from the requirement of subdivision (1).

Any manufacturer of wall-covering products that operates for seven (7) continuous days per week, twenty-four (24) hours per day, and has complied with the provisions of subsection (a) is exempt from the requirement that the work be voluntary on Sundays as provided in subsection (a); provided, that the manufacturer increases employment by at least ten percent (10%), within one year of its conversion to continuous operation from non-continuous operation.

Any manufacturer that operates three (3) shifts, or begins its work week on Sundays, may begin the shift or start the work week at 11:00 P.M. on Sunday and not be required to pay its employees one and one-half (11/2) times the normal rate of pay during the one hour period between 11:00 P.M. Sunday and 12 midnight.

Any and all employees of a chauffeur driven limousine or taxi cab company that operates seven (7) continuous days per week, twenty-four (24) hours per day are exempt from the provisions of subsection (a) hereof.

Any car rental company that operates a car rental agency at Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport and is required pursuant to its lease agreement with the Rhode Island airport corporation to operate on Sundays and/or holidays is exempt from the provisions of subsection (a) hereof with respect to work performed at its Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport location.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 141, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 7, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 7, effective June 1, 2021.

25-3-4, 25-3-4.1.
Repealed.

25-3-5.
Appeal from director’s decision.

All notices given and hearings conducted by the director, and all appeals from any order or determination of the director, shall be governed by the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2.

25-3-6.
Powers of director.

The director may promulgate any regulations as shall be necessary for the full and proper implementation of this chapter. The regulations shall be adopted only in accordance with the procedures established by chapter 35 of title 42. The director shall also be empowered to enforce and administer the provisions of this chapter and to prosecute violations of any of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2.

25-3-7.
Exemptions.

All regulations establishing exemptions adopted in accordance with the provisions of §

25-3-6

prior to July 1, 2021, shall remain in full force and effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 172, § 1, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 173, § 1, effective July 6, 2021.

25-3-8.
Penalty for violations.

Any employer convicted of violating the provisions of §

25-3-2

shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each employee involved and each separate offense committed, but in no event shall the fine be less than two hundred dollars ($200).

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2.

25-3-9.
Employee’s remedies.

Every employee who is discharged, disciplined, or discriminated against by any employer in violation of the provisions of this chapter shall be entitled to maintain a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction. If judgment is rendered in the employee’s favor, he or she shall be entitled to reinstatement and double the amount of back pay and allowances lost as a result of the discharge, discipline, or discrimination, together with interest on the amount at the rate provided by law, attorneys fees, and costs and expenses of the action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2.

25-3-10.
Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter or the application of it to any employer or employee is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter and the application of those provisions to other employers or employees shall not be affected by that invalidity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 110, § 2.

25-3-11.
Violations by cities or towns.

Any city or town that violates the provisions of this chapter as it relates to the observance of holidays shall be punished by a penalty not to exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation. The penalty shall be paid into the general fund of the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 150, § 1.